Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB237.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 91A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Associated with" means an employee:
1. Works an average of thirty percent (30%) or more of his or her
workdays during the calendar year within the corporate office; and
2. Performs remote work that requires continuous or material reliance
on centralized technological systems or operational assets that are
located within the corporate office;
(b) "Corporate office" means the office, located within the Commonwealth of
Kentucky, where a business's officers or other management staff direct,
control, or coordinate all or a portion of the business's business activities,
and the office:
1. Was subject to the influence of an executed incentive agreement; and
2. Has an average of one thousand (1,000) or more employees associated
with the corporate office during the calendar year;
(c) "Incentive agreement" means a written agreement between a local
government and a business entered into on or after January 1, 2001, that
includes occupational license fee incentives, infrastructure improvements,
land conveyance, or other economic inducements to operate the business's
corporate office within the jurisdiction of the local government;
(d) "Local government" means a city, urban-county government, charter
county government, consolidated local government, or unified local
government located within the Commonwealth;
(e) "Occupational license fees" means any occupational license fee levied on
Page 1 of 4
XXXX 2/24/2026 2:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2265
salaries, wages, commissions, or other compensation under KRS 91.200,
92.280, or 92.281;
(f) "Remote work" means:
1. For purposes of subsection (2) of this section, work performed by an
employee at a location other than the corporate office or a satellite
office of the business located within the Commonwealth; and
2. For purposes of subsection (3) of this section, work performed by an
employee at a location other than the state government office to which
the employee is assigned; and
(g) "Satellite office":
1. Means a physical location within the Commonwealth, other than the
corporate office, used by the business to conduct business activities
under the business's direction and control; and
2. Does not include a home office within a residence, temporary sites,
virtual offices, or a third-party location not subject to the business's
operational control.
(2) (a) Except for any portion of an employee’s wages apportioned by the employer
for work performed at a satellite office, one hundred percent (100%) of the
wages of an employee associated with the corporate office shall be
apportioned to the local government where the corporate office is located,
regardless of where the employee performs his or her work, including
remote work, and shall be subject to the occupational license fees imposed
by the local government where the corporate office is located.
(b) This subsection shall apply for a period of fifty (50) years from the date of
the execution of the incentive agreement.
(3) One hundred percent (100%) of the wages of an employee assigned to a state
government office shall be apportioned to the local government where the state
Page 2 of 4
XXXX 2/24/2026 2:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2265
government office is located and the employee is assigned, regardless of where
the employees performs his or her work, including remote work, and shall be
subject to the occupational license fees imposed by the local government where
the state government office is located.
(4) An employee subject to occupational license fee requirements under subsection
(2) or (3) of this section may submit a refund claim to the local government that
received the occupational license fees for any workdays the employee physically
worked outside of the local government’s jurisdiction, subject to the provisions of
KRS 67.750 to 67.795.
(5) (a) Subject to the provisions of KRS 67.750 to 67.795, a local government
receiving occupational license fees pursuant to this section shall establish a
procedure for the submission and review of refund claims submitted to it
under subsection (4) of this section, including requirements for:
1. Documentation of work location;
2. Proof of occupational license fees withheld;
3. Employer verification; and
4. Any additional criteria necessary to determine eligibility.
(b) Refunds shall be prorated based on the percentage of time the employee
physically worked outside of the local government's jurisdiction and shall
be processed within ninety (90) days of receipt of a completed claim.
(c) A local government that issues a refund to an employee under this
subsection shall inform any other tax district located within the
Commonwealth where the employee claimed to have physically worked in
conformance with KRS 67.791.
(d) Subject to the terms of an applicable incentive agreement, a local
government issuing a refund to an employee under this subsection may seek
reimbursement from the party to the incentive agreement for any portion of
Page 3 of 4
XXXX 2/24/2026 2:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2265
the incentive payment the local government made to the party prior to
issuing the employee refund if the incentive payment was based on
occupational license fee revenues that are attributable to the employee
receiving the refund.
Section 2. KRS 67.780 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Every employer making payment of compensation to an employee shall deduct and
withhold upon the payment of the compensation any tax imposed against the
compensation by a tax district. Amounts withheld shall be paid to the levying tax
district in accordance with KRS 67.783.
(2) A tax district may impose minimum and maximum tax liabilities for the tax on
compensation.
(3) Compensation subject to withholding under this section may be subject to
apportionment under Section 1 of this Act.
Section 3. This Act shall apply only to the withholding, apportionment, and
distribution of occupational license fees for wages paid on or after the effective date of
this Act. This Act shall not establish any cause of action, claim, or right to recover
occupational license fees apportioned or distributed to another local government prior to
the effective date of this Act.
Section 4. If any provision of this Act or its application thereof to any person or
circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect the other provisions or
applications of the Act that can be given effect without the invalid provision or
application, and to this end the provisions of this Act are severable.
Section 5. This Act may be cited as the Economic Development Incentive
Retention Act.
Page 4 of 4
XXXX 2/24/2026 2:22 PM Jacketed